Illinois, session 104th, SB3956.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 5Section 4-620 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/4-620 new)7    Sec. 4-620. Solid waste disposal system regulation.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Sanitary landfill" has the meaning given to that term in 10Section 3.445 of the Environmental Protection Act.11    "Solid waste" has the meaning given to that term in the 12Environmental Protection Act. "Solid waste" does not include 13hazardous waste as defined in the Environmental Protection 14Act.15    (b) The Commission shall establish a process for the 16review of disposal fees, fuel surcharges, and other fees 17imposed by the owners and operators of sanitary landfills for 18the disposal of solid waste to ensure that the fees are just 19and reasonable. The Commission shall adopt any rules necessary 20to administer the provisions of this Section.